Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1364
Plans, specifications, and records of highway projects; available to public, when.

The department shall, upon the request of any citizen of this state, disclose to such citizen full information concerning any highway construction, alteration, maintenance, or repair project in this state, whether completed, presently in process, or contemplated for future action, and permit an examination of the plans, specifications, and records concerning such project, except that any information received by the department as confidential by the laws of this state shall not be disclosed. Any person who willfully fails to comply with the provisions of this section shall be guilty of official misconduct. By the provisions of this section, the officials of the department will not be required to furnish information on the right-of-way of any proposed highway until such information can be made available to the general public.

Laws 1959, c. 179, § 1, p. 650;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 134.